Louisiana, session 2026, HB490.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2191(B) through (E) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
38:2191(F) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2191. Payments under contract
* * *
B.(1) Any Except as provided in Subsection C of this Section, any public
entity failing to make any progressive stage payment within forty-five days
following receipt of a certified request for payment by the public entity without
reasonable cause shall be liable for reasonable attorney fees and interest charged at
one-half percent accumulated daily, not to exceed fifteen percent. Any public entity
failing to make any final payments after formal final acceptance and within
forty-five days following receipt of a clear lien certificate by the public entity shall
be liable for reasonable attorney fees and interest charged at one-half percent
accumulated daily, not to exceed fifteen percent.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1162 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 490
(2) Any interest received by the contractor pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, shall be disbursed on a prorated basis among the contractor and
subcontractors, each receiving a prorated portion based on the principal amount due
within ten business days of receipt of the interest.
C.(1) If a public entity, pursuant to a public contract, is the recipient of all
or a portion of the funding for a public works contract from another public entity or
the United States government, the recipient public entity shall not be subject to the
requirements of Paragraph (B)(1) of this Section and interest shall not begin to run
unless and until the public entity receives funds from the paying public entity in an
amount necessary to pay the applicable progressive stage payment or final payment
for the public works contract. However, upon receipt of funding from the paying
public entity, the contracting entity shall pay the contractor within five days of
receipt of the funds. Failure to pay without reasonable cause shall subject the
contracting public entity to the statutory interest provided for in Paragraph (B)(1) of
this Section.
(2) Prior to the imposition of interest in accordance with Paragraph (B)(1)
of this Section, the contractor shall notify the public entity, in writing, of the date
that the contractor claims the forty-five days began to run from the certified request
for payment and the date that the forty-five days from a certified request for payment
expires. The contractor shall also notify the public entity, in writing, on the
twentieth and tenth day prior to the expiration of the forty-five day request for
payment period. Failure of the contractor to comply with the provisions of this
Paragraph shall extend the imposition of interest for an additional forty-five days.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, if the
governor or the president of the United States declares an emergency, including but
not limited to a natural disaster or public health emergency, exists in this state, the
time limits and requirements established in this Section shall be interrupted until the
emergency declaration expires. Upon the expiration of the emergency declaration,
the time limits and requirements established in this Section shall begin anew.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1162 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 490
C. D. The provisions of this Section shall not be subject to waiver by
contract. However, the time limits and requirements set forth in Paragraph (B)(1)
of this Section may be extended by written agreement of the public entity and the
contractor.
D. E. Any public entity failing to make any progressive stage payments
arbitrarily or without reasonable cause, or any final payment when due as provided
in this Section, shall be subject to mandamus to compel the payment of the sums due
under the contract up to the amount of the appropriation made for the award and
execution of the contract, including any authorized change orders.
E. F. A declaration that a public works contract is null and void as being
contrary to the provisions of R.S. 38:2211 et seq. shall not affect amounts due and
payable under the contract, including overhead and profit, for the work performed
by or on behalf of the contractor.